src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VEKSA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
                 +V+Inf:eksa    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eksi    Pass  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eksur   #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:eksur   #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eksa    Pass  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:aks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:aks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:aks     #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:uksu    Pass  ;
              +V+Imp+Sg:eks     #  ;
              +V+Imp+Pl:eksið   #  ;
              +V+PrsPrc:eksandi VANDI ;
                       :aks     p18  ;
                 +V+Sup:aksið   #  ;


LEXICON s30/26_1
!! **@LEXNAME@** dáma
		s30		;
		s26_1	;
      	p7      ;

LEXICON HYGGJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:hyggja   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:hyggi   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:hygg     	urPass     ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:hygg     	urPass     ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:hyggja   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:hugdi   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:hugdi   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:hugdi   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:hugdu   	Pass       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:hygg   		#          ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:hyggið   	#          ;
      +V+PrsPrc:hyggjandi   VANDI      ;
               :hug      	p8         ;
         +V+Sup:hugt   		#          ;

LEXICON TYGGJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:tyggja   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:tyggi   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:tyggi     	rPass      ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:tyg     	girPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:tyg     	girPass    ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:tyggi     	rPass      ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:tyggja   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:tugdi   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tugdi   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:tugdi   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:tugdu   	Pass       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:tygg   		#          ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:tyggið   	#          ;
      +V+PrsPrc:tyggjandi   VANDI      ;
               :tug      	p8         ;
         +V+Sup:tugt   		#          ;

LEXICON MYLA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:myla    #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:myli     Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:mylur   #       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:mylur   #       ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:myla    Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:myldi  Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:myldi  Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:myldi  Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:myldu   Pass       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:myl     #       ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:mylið   #       ;
      +V+PrsPrc:mylandi	VANDI   ;
               :myl     p7       ;
         +V+Sup:mylt   	#       ;

LEXICON BLASA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:blása		Pass	;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:blási		Pass	;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:blæs		iurPass	;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:blæs		iurPass	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:blása		Pass	;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:blásti		Pass	;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:blásti		Pass	;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:blásti		Pass	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:blástu		Pass	;
      +V+Imp+Sg:blás		#       ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:blásið  	#       ;
      +V+PrsPrc:blásandi	VANDI   ;
               :blást       p5      ;
         +V+Sup:blást   	#       ;

LEXICON TYSJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:ysja   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:ysi   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:ysur   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:ysur   	#       ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:ysja   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:usti   Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:usti   Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:usti  	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:ustu   	Pass       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:ys   	#       ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:ysið   	#       ;
      +V+PrsPrc:ysjandi VANDI   ;
               :us      p5pos       ;
         +V+Sup:ust   	#       ;

LEXICON GROA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:gróa   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:grói   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:gró   	rPass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:gró     rtPass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:gró    	rPass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:gróa   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:gróði  Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:gróði  Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:gróði  Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:gróðu   Pass       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:gró   	#       ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:gróið   #       ;
      +V+PrsPrc:gróandi VANDI   ;
               :gró   p26       ;
         +V+Sup:gróð   	#       ;
         +V+Sup:gróðið  #       ;

LEXICON KVOTTA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:kvøtta   	#       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:kvøtti   	Pass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:kvøtt   	urPass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:kvøtti   	rPass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:kvøtt   	urPass       ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:kvøtti   	rPass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kvøtta   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:kvøtti   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:kvatt   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kvøtti   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kvatt   	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:kvøtti  	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:kvatt  	Pass       ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:kvøttu   	Pass       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:kvøtt   	#       ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:kvøtta   	#       ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:kvøttið   	#       ;
      +V+PrsPrc:kvøttandi 	VANDI   ;
      +V+PrfPtc:kvøttur   	#       ;
               :kvøtt   	p26       ;
         +V+Sup:kvøtt   	#       ;
         +V+Sup:kvøttið   	#       ;

LEXICON GALDA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
                 +V+Inf:alda    Pass  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:aldi    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:eldur   #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:eldur   #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:alda    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:alt     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:alt     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:alt     #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:uldu    #  ;
              +V+Imp+Sg:alt     #  ;
              +V+Imp+Sg:ald     #  ;
              +V+Imp+Pl:aldið   #  ;
              +V+PrsPrc:aldandi VANDI ;
                       :old     p26  ;
                 +V+Sup:oldið   #  ;


!LEXICON
!         +V+Inf:   	#       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:   	#       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:   	#       ;
! +Ind+Prs+3Sg:   		#       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:   	#       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:   	#       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:   	#       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:  	#       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:   	#       ;
!      +V+Imp+Sg:   	#       ;
!      +V+Imp+Pl:   	#       ;
!      +V+PrsPrc:   	VANDI   ;
!      +V+PrfPtc:   	#       ;
!         +V+Sup:   	#       ;

!         +V+Inf+Pass:   #       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg+Pass:   #       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg+Pass:   #       ;
! +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+Imp+Sg+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+Imp+Pl+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+PrsPrc+Pass:   #       ;
!      +V+PrfPtc+Pass:   #       ;
!         +V+Sup+Pass:   #       ;



LEXICON TAKAST !
!! **@LEXNAME@** 
	:%>tak		reflinf		;
	:%>tak		pres_1ist	;
	:%>tek		pres_23st	;
	:%>tak		pres_plast	;
	:%>tók		pret_st		;
	:%>tók		pret_plust	;

LEXICON LOYPAST !
!! **@LEXNAME@** loypast
			reflinf		;
			pres_ist	;
			pres_plast	;
			pret_tist	;
			pret_pltust	;

LEXICON sxrefl !
!! **@LEXNAME@** This is an ad hoc lexicon
  s74 ;

LEXICON s74 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** grindast
  			reflinf  	;
  			pres_ast 	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_adist  ;
  :%>að		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s75 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** balast
  			reflinf   	;
  			pres_ist  	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_dist 	;
  :%>d		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s76 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** ræðast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist  	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_dist 	;
  :%>d		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s77 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** skiftast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist  	;
  			pres_plast	;
  			pret_ist	;
 			pret_plust	;

LEXICON s78 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** farast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_1ist	;
  :%^IUML	pres_23st	;
  			pres_plast	;
  :%^AB3	pret_st		;
  :%^AB3	pret_plust	;

LEXICON s79 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** skjótast
  :%>jót	reflinf 	;
  :%>jót	pres_1ist	;
  :%>jýt	pres_23st	;
  :%>jót	pres_plast	;
  :%>eyt	pret_st		;
  :%>ut		pret_plust	;

LEXICON s80 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** trivast
  			reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
  			pres_23st	;
    		pres_plast	;
  :%^AB1	pret_st		;
  :%^VSH	pret_plust	;

LEXICON s81 !
!! **@LEXNAME@** kíkjast
  :%>j		reflinf 	;
  			pres_ist	;
  :%>j 		pres_plast	;
  			pret_tist	;
  			pret_pltust	;
